Texas, session 892, HB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 481.037, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 481.037.  DESIGNATION OF CERTAIN SUBSTANCES [CARISOPRODOL].  Schedule IV includes: (1)  carisoprodol; (2)  mifepristone; and (3)  misoprostol. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act. An offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.  For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.